Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5591.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 104
VEHICLE BARRIERS
23-104-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as "The Charlotte A. Vacca Act."
23-104-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Owner" means the proprietor, operator, lessor, or sublessor of commercial real estate
defined in § 34-49-2, which is utilized, in whole or in part, by a retail establishment.
(2) "Retail establishments" means all sales outlets, stores, shops, or other places of business
located within the state, which operate primarily to sell or convey food or goods.
(3) "Vehicle barrier" means a safety device that meets, at a minimum, the vehicle impact
protection standards as adopted and amended by the Rhode Island building code commission, and
that is installed to protect persons located within or on the property or to protect pedestrians, from
collisions into buildings by motor vehicles.
23-104-3. Installation of vehicle barriers.
Owners, as a part of any new construction of commercial real estate or buildings thereon,

shall install vehicle barriers. Owners shall also be encouraged to install vehicle barriers at the
locations of all of the owner's other retail establishments to protect persons and pedestrians on the
property or within the establishment.
23-104-4. Insurance discount.
(a) An insurer shall consider the installation of vehicle barriers as a safety measure and
shall provide or offer a discount on the owner's insurance covering damage or loss to the covered
commercial real estate or liability arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of the
commercial real estate relative to the reduced risk to the property as a result of installation of the
vehicle barrier(s).
(b) Any discounts on insurance provided in accordance with this section shall be
determined to be actuarially sound and approved by the insurance commissioner prior to their
utilization by insurers.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002056
========
LC002056 - Page 2 of 3